New Mexico, session 2026, SB159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. [NEW MATERIAL] GRADUATE MEDICAL EDUCATION PAYMENTS.-- A. As used in this section: (1) "board" means the board of regents of the university of New Mexico; and (2) "eligible entity" means: (a) a federally qualified health center; (b) a rural health clinic; (c) an independent psychiatric facility; or (d) a critical access hospital that sponsors or participates in an accredited graduate medical education residency program located in New Mexico. B. The board shall: (1) provide payments to eligible entities to supplement direct and indirect costs for medical residents associated with graduate medical education that are not otherwise reimbursed, including: (a) medical resident salaries and benefits; (b) supervising physician and faculty costs; (c) accreditation and instructional expenses; and (d) program administration; (2) supplement the costs of medical residents for the duration of their residency, spread out over fiscal years 2027 through 2029; and (3) prioritize New Mexico residents. C. The board may use money appropriated pursuant to Section 2 of this 2026 act to provide to eligible entities to fully staff and contract for services to carry out the provisions of this section. SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION.--Twenty-seven million dollars ($27,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the board of regents of the university of New Mexico for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 through 2029 to supplement direct and indirect costs incurred by eligible entities associated with graduate medical education as provided in Section 1 of this act. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2029 shall revert to the general fund. - 3 -